Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1
COUNTY PLANNING

30-28-101. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Disposition" means a contract of sale resulting in the transfer of equitable title to an interest in subdivided land; an option to purchase an interest in subdivided land; a lease or an assignment of an interest in subdivided land; or any other conveyance of an interest in subdivided land which is not made pursuant to one of the foregoing.

"Evidence" means any map, table, chart, contract, or other document or testimony, prepared or certified by a qualified person to attest to a specific claim or condition, which evidence shall be relevant and competent and shall support the position maintained by the subdivider.

"Municipal planning commission" means any planning commission or other body charged with the functions of such commission of any city, city and county, or incorporated town, whether created pursuant to the authority of state statute or of home rule charter.

"Planning commission" means either a planning commission or, in a county where there is no planning commission, the board of county commissioners.

"Plat" means a map and supporting materials of certain described land prepared in accordance with subdivision regulations as an instrument for recording of real estate interests with the county clerk and recorder.

"Preliminary plan" means the map of a proposed subdivision and specified supporting materials, drawn and submitted in accordance with the requirements of adopted regulations, to permit the evaluation of the proposal prior to detailed engineering and design.

"Region" means the area encompassed by a regional planning commission, being the combined land areas subject to the jurisdiction of the participating governmental units.

"Sketch plan" means a map of a proposed subdivision, drawn and submitted in accordance with the requirements of adopted regulations, to evaluate feasibility and design characteristics at an early state in the planning.

"Subdivider" or "developer" means any person, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, or corporation participating as owner, promoter, developer, or sales agent in the planning, platting, development, promotion, sale, or lease of a subdivision.

"Subdivision" or "subdivided land" means any parcel of land in the state which is to be used for condominiums, apartments, or any other multiple-dwelling units, unless such land when previously subdivided was accompanied by a filing which complied with the provisions of this part 1 with substantially the same density, or which is divided into two or more parcels, separate interests, or interests in common, unless exempted under paragraph (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection (10). As used in this section, "interests" includes any and all interests in the surface of land but excludes any and all subsurface interests.

The terms "subdivision" and "subdivided land", as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection (10), shall not apply to any division of land which creates parcels of land each of which comprises thirty-five or more acres of land and none of which is intended for use by multiple owners.

Unless the method of disposition is adopted for the purpose of evading this part 1, the terms "subdivision" and "subdivided land", as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection (10), shall not apply to any division of land:

Which creates parcels of land, such that the land area of each of the parcels, when divided by the number of interests in any such parcel, results in thirty-five or more acres per interest;

Which could be created by any court in this state pursuant to the law of eminent domain, or by operation of law, or by order of any court in this state if the board of county commissioners of the county in which the property is situated is given timely notice of any such pending action by the court and given opportunity to join as a party in interest in such proceeding for the purpose of raising the issue of evasion of this part 1 prior to entry of the court order; and, if the board does not file an appropriate pleading within twenty days after receipt of such notice by the court, then such action may proceed before the court;

Which is created by a lien, mortgage, deed of trust, or any other security instrument;

Which is created by a security or unit of interest in any investment trust regulated under the laws of this state or any other interest in an investment entity;

Which creates cemetery lots;

Which creates an interest in oil, gas, minerals, or water which is severed from the surface ownership of real property;

Which is created by the acquisition of an interest in land in the name of a husband and wife or other persons in joint tenancy or as tenants in common, and any such interest shall be deemed for purposes of this subsection (10) as only one interest;

Which is created by the combination of contiguous parcels of land into one larger parcel. If the resulting parcel is less than thirty-five acres in land area, only one interest in said land shall be allowed. If the resulting parcel is greater than thirty-five acres in land area, such land area, divided by the number of interests in the resulting parcel, must result in thirty-five or more acres per interest. Easements and rights-of-way shall not be considered interests for purposes of this subparagraph (VIII).

Which is created by a contract concerning the sale of land which is contingent upon the purchaser's obtaining approval to subdivide, pursuant to this article and any applicable county regulations, the land which he is to acquire pursuant to the contract;

Which creates a cluster development pursuant to part 4 of this article.

The board of county commissioners may, pursuant to rules and regulations or resolution, exempt from this definition of the terms "subdivision" and "subdivided land" any division of land if the board of county commissioners determines that such division is not within the purposes of this part 1.

"Subdivision improvements agreement" means one or more security arrangements which a county shall accept to secure the actual cost of construction of such public improvements as are required by county subdivision regulations within the subdivision. The "subdivision improvements agreement" may include any one or a combination of the types of security or collateral listed in this subsection (11), and the subdivider may substitute security in order to release portions of the subdivision for sale. The types of collateral which may be used as security under the "subdivision improvements agreement" are as follows: Restrictions on the conveyance, sale, or transfer of any lot, lots, tract, or tracts of land within the subdivision as set forth on the plat or as recorded by separate instrument; performance or property bonds; private or public escrow agreements; loan commitments; assignments of receivables; liens on property; letters of credit; deposits of certified funds; or other similar surety agreements. Security, other than plat restrictions, required under the "subdivision improvements agreement" shall equal in value the cost of improvements to be completed but shall not be required on the portion of the subdivision subject to plat restriction. The county shall not require security arrangements with collateral arrangements in excess of the actual cost of construction of the public improvements. The amount of security may be incrementally reduced as subdivision improvements are completed.

"Unincorporated" means situated outside of cities and towns, so that, when used in connection with "territory", "areas", or the like, it covers, includes, and relates to territory or areas which are not within the boundaries of any city or town.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 309, § 28.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 28.

CRS 53:

§§ 106-2-28, 106-2-34.

L. 59:

p. 624, § 6.

L. 61:

p. 591, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§§ 106-2-27, 106-2-33.

L. 72:

pp. 499, 500, §§ 4, 5.

L. 73:

pp. 1083, 1084, §§ 1, 1.

L. 74:

(3)(a) amended, p. 334, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 75:

(11) R&RE, p. 988, § 2, effective July 14.

L. 77:

(10)(a) amended, p. 1453, § 1, effective May 24; (10)(c)(II) R&RE, p. 1455, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 83:

(10)(c)(IX) added, p. 1250, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 96:

(10)(c)(X) added, p. 1880, § 1, effective June 6.

Cross references:

(1) For municipal planning and zoning, see § 31-23-101 et seq.

(2) For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

30-28-102. Unincorporated territory.

The boards of county commissioners of the respective counties within this state are authorized to provide for the physical development of the unincorporated territory within the county and for the zoning of all or any part of such unincorporated territory in the manner provided in this part 1.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 294, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-1.

30-28-103. County planning commission.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), the board of county commissioners of any county within the state is authorized to appoint a commission of not less than three and not more than nine members, to be known as the county planning commission; except that, in counties of the state having a population of fifteen thousand or less desiring to establish a commission, the board of county commissioners may constitute the commission, or the board of county commissioners may appoint a separate body to serve as the commission. In counties of the state having a population of one hundred thousand or more, the board of county commissioners is authorized to appoint a commission of not less than three and not more than fifteen members.

Each of such members of the commission shall be a resident of the county. The term of appointed members of the commission shall be three years and until their respective successors have been appointed, but the terms of office shall be staggered by making the appointments so that approximately one-third of the members' terms expire each year. Members of the commission on July 1, 1977, shall serve the remainder of the terms for which they were appointed. Thereafter, members shall be appointed pursuant to this subsection (2).

The members of the commission shall receive such compensation as may be fixed by the board of county commissioners, and the board of county commissioners shall provide for reimbursement of the members of the commission for actual expenses incurred. The board of county commissioners shall provide for the filling of vacancies in the membership of the commission and for the removal of a member for nonperformance of duty or misconduct. The board of county commissioners may appoint associate members of such commission, each of whom shall be a resident of the county, and, in the event any regular member is temporarily unable to act owing to absence from the county, illness, interest in any matter before the commission, or any other cause, his place may be taken during such temporary disability by an associate member designated for that purpose.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 295, § 3.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-3.

L. 56:

p. 179, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-3.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1456, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 32, § 1, effective August 3.

30-28-104. Chairman - rules - staff - information - grants and gifts.

The county planning commission shall elect a chairman from its members, whose term shall be for one year, and the commission may create and fill such other offices as it may determine. The commission shall adopt such rules and regulations governing its procedure as it may consider necessary or advisable and shall keep a record of its proceedings, which record shall be open to inspection by the public at all reasonable times. The board of county commissioners has the authority to employ experts and a staff and shall pay such expenses as may be deemed necessary for carrying out the powers conferred and the duties prescribed in this article. The county planning commission is directed to make use of the expert advice and information which may be furnished by appropriate federal, state, county, and municipal officials, departments, and agencies and in particular by the director of the division of planning in the department of local affairs of the state of Colorado. All state officials, departments, and agencies having information, maps, and data pertinent to county planning or zoning are authorized and directed to make the same available for the use of the county planning commission as well as to furnish such other technical assistance and advice as they may have available for such purpose.

The county planning commission is specifically empowered to receive and expend all grants, gifts, and bequests, specifically including state and federal funds and other funds available for the purposes for which the commission exists, and to contract with the state of Colorado, the United States, and all other legal entities with respect thereto. The county planning commission may provide, within the limitations of its budget, matching funds wherever grants, gifts, bequests, and contractual assistance are available on such basis.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 294, § 2.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 2.

L. 53:

p. 225, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-2.

L. 59:

p. 616, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-2.

L. 67:

p. 72, § 1.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1457, § 2, effective July 1.

30-28-105. Regional planning commission.

The governing body or, in charter cities, the officials having charge of public improvements of any municipality or group of municipalities, together with the boards of county commissioners of any counties in which such municipality or group of municipalities is located or of any adjoining counties; or the governing bodies or, in charter cities, the officials having charge of public improvements of any municipality or group of municipalities, acting independently of the boards of county commissioners in which such municipality or group of municipalities is located; or the boards of county commissioners of any two or more counties may cooperate in the creation of a regional planning commission for any region defined as may be agreed upon by said cooperating governing bodies or officials or boards limited to a region within the jurisdiction of said cooperating governing bodies.

The number and qualifications of members of any such regional planning commission, their terms, and the method of their appointment or removal shall be such as may be determined and agreed upon by said cooperating governing bodies or officials and boards; but each participating county or municipality shall be entitled to at least one voting representative. The regional planning commission shall elect its chairman, whose term shall be one year, with eligibility for reelection. The commission may create and fill such other offices as it may determine.

Any board of county commissioners or other county officials or the chief executive officer of any municipality, from time to time, upon the request of the commission and for the purpose of special surveys, may assign or detail to the commission any members of staffs of county or municipal administrative departments or may direct any such department to make for the commission special surveys or studies requested by the commission.

The proportion of the expenses of the regional planning commission to be borne respectively by any governing body cooperating in the establishment and maintenance of the commission shall be such as may be determined and agreed upon by the cooperating bodies or officials or boards, and they are authorized to appropriate or cause to be appropriated their respective shares of such expense.

Within the amounts duly appropriated or otherwise received, the regional planning commission has the power to appoint such clerical and stenographic employees and such technically qualified staff as are necessary to do the work of the commission. The regional planning commission has the further power to contract for such other services, facilities, and personnel as it may require within its means, including the services of professional planners and other consultants.

The regional planning commission is specifically empowered to receive and expend all grants, gifts, and bequests, specifically including state and federal funds and other funds available for the purposes for which the commission exists, and to contract with the state of Colorado, the United States, and all other legal entities with respect thereto. The regional planning commission may provide, within the limitations of its budget, matching funds wherever grants, gifts, bequests, and contractual assistance are available on such basis.

A regional planning commission shall be a body politic and corporate, with power to sue and be sued. It shall be liable on its undertakings, contractual or otherwise. The individual members thereof and the cooperating governing bodies or officials and boards shall not be liable on the undertakings of the commission, contractual or otherwise, regardless of the procedure by which such undertakings, or any of them, may be entered into.

The regional planning commission has the power to adopt articles to regulate and govern its affairs, whether as an incorporated association or otherwise, in the performance of the regional planning functions as defined by statute; such articles shall contain rules pertaining to the transaction of the commission's business. The regional planning commission shall keep records of its resolutions, transactions, contractual undertakings, findings, and determinations, which records shall be public records. The regional planning commission has and shall exercise all powers necessary or incidental to exercise fully the powers and authority conferred in this section.

A regional planning commission may, to the extent provided for in a resolution adopted by a board of county commissioners, perform the functions of a county planning commission as provided for in this part 1.

Nothing in this part 1 shall preclude participation by any county or municipality in more than one regional planning commission.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 295, § 4.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-4.

L. 56:

p. 181, § 1.

L. 59:

p. 617, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-4.

L. 72:

p. 498, § 1.

30-28-106. Adoption of master plan - contents.

It is the duty of a county planning commission to make and adopt a master plan for the physical development of the unincorporated territory of the county. When a county planning commission decides to adopt a master plan, the commission shall conduct public hearings, after notice of such public hearings has been published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in a manner sufficient to notify the public of the time, place, and nature of the public hearing, prior to final adoption of a master plan in order to encourage public participation in and awareness of the development of such plan and shall accept and consider oral and written public comments throughout the process of developing the plan.

It is the duty of a regional planning commission to make and adopt a regional plan for the physical development of the territory within the boundaries of the region, but no such plan shall be effective within the boundaries of any incorporated municipality within the region unless such plan is adopted by the governing body of the municipality for the development of its territorial limits and under the terms of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2). When a regional planning commission decides to adopt a master plan, the commission shall conduct public hearings, after notice of such public hearings has been published in a newspaper of general circulation in the region in a manner sufficient to notify the public of the time, place, and nature of the public hearing, prior to final adoption of a master plan in order to encourage public participation in and awareness of the development of such plan and shall accept and consider oral and written public comments throughout the process of developing the plan.

Any plan adopted by a regional planning commission shall not be deemed an official advisory plan of any municipality or county unless adopted by the planning commission of such municipality or county.

The master plan of a county or region, with the accompanying maps, plats, charts, and descriptive and explanatory matter, must show the county or regional planning commission's recommendations for the development of the territory covered by the plan. The master plan of a county or region is an advisory document to guide land development decisions; however, the plan or any part thereof may be made binding by inclusion in the county's or region's adopted subdivision, zoning, platting, planned unit development, or other similar land development regulations after satisfying notice, due process, and hearing requirements for legislative or quasi-judicial processes as appropriate. After consideration of each of the following, where applicable or appropriate, the master plan may include:

The general location, character, and extent of existing, proposed, or projected streets or roads, rights-of-way, viaducts, bridges, waterways, waterfronts, parkways, highways, mass transit routes and corridors, and any transportation plan prepared by any metropolitan planning organization that covers all or a portion of the county or region and that the county or region has received notification of or, if the county or region is not located in an area covered by a metropolitan planning organization, any transportation plan prepared by the department of transportation that the county or region has received notification of and that applies to the county or region;

The general location of public places or facilities, including public schools, culturally, historically, or archaeologically significant buildings, sites, and objects, playgrounds, forests, reservations, squares, parks, airports, aviation fields, military installations, and other public ways, grounds, open spaces, trails, and designated federal, state, and local wildlife areas. For purposes of this section, "military installation" shall have the same meaning as specified in section

29-20-105.6 (2)(b)

, C.R.S.

The general location and extent of public utilities, terminals, capital facilities, and transfer facilities, whether publicly or privately owned, for water, light, power, sanitation, transportation, communication, heat, and other purposes, and any proposed or projected needs for capital facilities and utilities, including the priorities, anticipated costs, and funding proposals for such facilities and utilities;

The general location and extent of an adequate and suitable supply of water.

If the master plan includes a water supply element, the planning commission shall consult with the entities that supply water for use within the county or region to ensure coordination on water supply and facility planning, and the water supply element must identify water supplies and facilities sufficient to meet the needs of the public and private infrastructure reasonably anticipated or identified in the planning process.

The water supply element must include water conservation policies, to be determined by the county, which may include goals specified in the state water plan adopted pursuant to section

37-60-106.3

and may include policies to implement water conservation and other state water plan goals as a condition of development approvals, including subdivisions, planned unit developments, special use permits, and zoning changes. A county with a master plan that includes a water supply element shall ensure that its master plan includes water conservation policies at the first amending of the master plan that occurs after September 14, 2020, but in no case later than July 1, 2025.

The department of local affairs created in section

24-1-125

may hire and employ one full-time employee to provide educational resources and assistance to counties that include water conservation policies in their master plans as described in subsection (3)(a)(IV)(C) of this section.

Nothing in this subsection (3)(a)(IV) shall be construed to supersede, abrogate, or otherwise impair the allocation of water pursuant to the state constitution or laws, the right to beneficially use water pursuant to decrees, contracts, or other water use agreements, or the operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, or use of any water facility.

The acceptance, widening, removal, extension, relocation, narrowing, vacation, abandonment, modification, or change of use of any of the public ways, rights-of-way, including the coordination of such rights-of-way with the rights-of-way of other counties, regions, or municipalities, grounds, open spaces, buildings, properties, utilities, or terminals, referred to in subparagraphs (I) to (IV) of this paragraph (a);

Methods for assuring access to appropriate conditions for solar, wind, or other alternative energy sources, including geothermal energy used for water heating or space heating or cooling in a single building, for space heating for more than one building through a pipeline network, or for electricity generation.

The general character, location, and extent of community centers, townsites, housing developments, whether public or private, the existing, proposed, or projected location of residential neighborhoods and sufficient land for future housing development for the existing and projected economic and other needs of all current and anticipated residents of the county or region, and urban conservation or redevelopment areas. If a county or region has entered into a regional planning agreement, such agreement may be incorporated by reference into the master plan.

The general location and extent of forests, agricultural areas, flood control areas, and open development areas for purposes of conservation, food and water supply, sanitary and drainage facilities, flood control, or the protection of urban development;

A land classification and utilization program;

Projections of population growth and housing needs to accommodate the projected population for specified increments of time. The county or region may base these projections upon data from the department of local affairs and upon the county's or region's local objectives.

The location of areas containing steep slopes, geological hazards, endangered or threatened species, wetlands, floodplains, floodways, and flood risk zones, highly erodible land or unstable soils, and wildfire hazards. For purposes of determining the location of such areas, the planning commission should consider the following sources for guidance:

The Colorado geological survey for defining and mapping geological hazards;

The United States fish and wildlife service of the United States department of the interior and the parks and wildlife commission created in section

33-9-101

, C.R.S., for locating areas inhabited by endangered or threatened species;

The United States Army corps of engineers and the United States fish and wildlife service national wetlands inventory for defining and mapping wetlands;

The federal emergency management agency for defining and mapping floodplains, floodways, and flood risk zones;

The natural resources conservation service of the United States department of agriculture for defining and mapping unstable soils and highly erodible land; and

The Colorado state forest service for locating wildfire hazard areas.

Any master plan of a county or region which includes mass transportation shall be coordinated with that of any adjacent county, region, or other political subdivision, as the case may be, to eliminate conflicts or inconsistencies and to assure the compatibility of such plans and their implementation pursuant to this section and sections

30-11-101

,

30-25-202

, and

30-26-301

.

The master plan of a county or region shall also include a master plan for the extraction of commercial mineral deposits pursuant to section

34-1-304

, C.R.S.

The master plan of a county or region may also include plans for the development of drainage basins in all or portions of the county or region. When county subdivision regulations require the payment of drainage fees, as provided in section

30-28-133

(11), the master plan shall include the plan for the development of drainage basins.

In creating the master plan of a county or region, the county or regional planning commission may take into consideration the availability of affordable housing within the county or region. Counties are encouraged to examine any regulatory impediments to the development of affordable housing.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 612, § 1, effective August 3, 2007.)

The master plan of a county or region may include designated utility corridors to facilitate the provision of utilities to all developments in the county or region.

Each county that has not already adopted a master plan and that meets one of the following descriptions shall adopt a master plan within two years after January 8, 2002:

Each county or city and county that has a population equal to or greater than ten thousand and the population of which has demonstrated an increase of either:

Ten percent or more during the calendar years 1994 to 1999; or

Ten percent or more during any five-year period ending in 2000 or any subsequent year;

Each county or city and county that has a population of one hundred thousand or more.

To the extent the county does not meet a description specified in subparagraph (I) or (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the counties of Clear Creek, Gilpin, Morgan, and Pitkin shall adopt a master plan within two years after January 8, 2002.

The department of local affairs shall annually determine, based on the population statistics maintained by said department, whether a county is subject to the requirements of this subsection (4), and shall notify any county that is newly identified as being subject to said requirements. Any such county shall have two years following receipt of notification from the department to adopt a master plan.

Once a county is identified as being subject to the requirements of this subsection (4), the county shall at all times thereafter remain subject to the requirements of this subsection (4), regardless of whether it continues to meet any of the descriptions in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4).

A master plan adopted in accordance with the requirements of subsection (4) of this section shall contain a recreational and tourism uses element pursuant to which the county shall indicate how it intends to provide for the recreational and tourism needs of residents of the county and visitors to the county through delineated areas dedicated to, without limitation, hiking, mountain biking, rock climbing, skiing, cross country skiing, rafting, fishing, boating, hunting, shooting, or any other form of sports or other recreational activity, as applicable, and commercial facilities supporting such uses.

The master plan of any county adopted or amended in accordance with the requirements of this section on and after August 8, 2005, shall satisfy the requirements of section 29-20-105.6, C.R.S., as applicable.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no master plan originally adopted or amended in accordance with the requirements of this section shall conflict with a master plan for the extraction of commercial mineral deposits adopted by the county pursuant to section 34-1-304, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 296, § 5.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-5.

L. 59:

p. 618, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-5.

L. 66:

p. 41, § 4.

L. 73:

pp. 467, 1054, §§ 4, 17.

L. 79:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1159, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 83:

(3)(d) added, p. 1236, § 4, effective April 23.

L. 97:

(3)(e) to (3)(g) added, p. 414, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 2000:

(1), (2)(a), and (3)(a) amended, p. 869, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(4) and (5) added, p. 21, § 1, effective January 8, 2002.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 1036, § 83, effective June 1.

L. 2005:

(6) added, p. 223, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

IP(3)(a) and (3)(f) amended and (7) added, p. 612, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(3)(a)(II) and (6) amended, (HB 10-1205), ch. 242, p. 1078, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

IP(3)(a) and (3)(a)(XI)(B) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1205, § 12, effective June 4.

L. 2020:

IP(3)(a) and (3)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 20-1095), ch. 82, p. 331, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(3)(a)(VI) amended, (SB 22-118), ch. 335, p. 2371, § 5, effective August 10.

30-28-107. Surveys and studies.

In the preparation of a county or regional master plan, a county or regional planning commission shall make careful and comprehensive surveys and studies of the existing conditions and probable future growth of the territory within its jurisdiction. The county or regional master plan shall be made with the general purpose of guiding and accomplishing a coordinated, adjusted, and harmonious development of the county or region which, in accordance with present and future needs and resources, will best promote the health, safety, morals, order, convenience, prosperity, or general welfare of the inhabitants, as well as efficiency and economy in the process of development, including such distribution of population and of the uses of land for urbanization, trade, industry, habitation, recreation, agriculture, forestry, and other purposes as will tend to create conditions favorable to health, safety, energy conservation, transportation, prosperity, civic activities, and recreational, educational, and cultural opportunities; will tend to reduce the wastes of physical, financial, or human resources which result from either excessive congestion or excessive scattering of population; and will tend toward an efficient and economic utilization, conservation, and production of the supply of food and water and of drainage, sanitary, and other facilities and resources.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 297, § 6.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-6.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1159, § 2, effective May 25.

30-28-108. Adoption of plan by resolution.

A county or regional planning commission may adopt the county or regional master plan as a whole by a single resolution or, as the work of making the whole master plan progresses, may adopt parts thereof, any such part to correspond generally with one or more of the functional subdivisions of the subject matter which may be included in the plan. The commission may amend, extend, or add to the plan or carry any part of it into greater detail from time to time. The adoption of the plan or any part, amendment, extension, or addition shall be by resolution carried by the affirmative votes of not less than a majority of the entire membership of the commission. The resolution shall refer expressly to the maps and descriptive matter intended by the commission to form the whole or part of the plan. The action taken shall be recorded on the map and descriptive matter by the identifying signature of the secretary of the commission.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 297, § 7.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-7.

30-28-109. Certification of plan.

The county planning commission shall certify a copy of its master plan, or any adopted part or amendment thereof or addition thereto, to the board of county commissioners of the county. The regional planning commission shall certify such copies to the boards of county commissioners of the counties lying wholly or partly within the region. The county or regional planning commission shall certify such copies to the planning commission of all municipalities within the county or region. Any municipal planning commission which receives any such certification may adopt so much of the plan, part, amendment, or addition as falls within the territory of the municipality as a part or amendment of or addition to the master plan of the municipality, and, when so adopted, it shall have the same force and effect as though made and prepared, as well as adopted, by such municipal planning commission.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 298, § 8.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-8.